test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_ID_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kúnid - ENGLISH : # CLASS_ID_STEM_2

     kúnid+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kúniida
     kúnid+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kúniidang
     kúnid+V+DIRECT+PAST: kúniidan
     kúnid+V+NON_FACTIVE: kúniidang
     kúnid+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kúniidang
     kúnid+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kúniidanggang
     kúnid+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kúniidangang
     kúnid+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kúniidiinii
     kúnid+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kúniidaangaa
     kúnid+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kúniidaangaan
     kúnid+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kúniidang k̲asa'áa
     kúnid+V+NEAR+FUTURE: kúniidang k̲asa'áang
     kúnid+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kúniidang k̲asaasdláa
     kúnid+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kúniidang k̲asaasdláang
     kúnid+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kúniid'ahlanggang
     kúnid+V+CERTAIN+PAST: kúniid'ahlanggan
     kúnid+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kúniid'ahlanggiinii
     kúnid+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kúniid'ahlans
     kúnid+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: kúniidaa'ahlang
     kúnid+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kúniidaa'ahlanggaa
     kúnid+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kúniidaa'ahlanggang
     kúnid+V+REFLEXIVE: kúniid'ahl
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kúniidang'waa
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kúniidang'waang
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kúniidang'waa.ang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kúniidang'anggang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kúniidang'angang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kúniidang k̲asaa'áng
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kúniidang k̲asaa'ánggang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kúniidang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kúniidang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kúniidang'ang'waa
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kúniidang'ang'waang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kúniidang'ang'waa.ang
